Nevada, session 83, AB314.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
*AB314_R1*

– 3 –
Sec. 3.1. NRS 226.420 is hereby amended to read as follows:
226.420 1. The State Treasurer shall establish by regulation a
program to provide reimbursement for tuition charges, registration
fees, laboratory fees and any other mandatory fees paid to an
institution within the Nevada System of Higher Education by a
person who:
(a) [Completed] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5,
completed a :
(1) Teacher Academy College Pathway Program offered
pursuant to NRS 388.223 [;] and
[(b) Except] , except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, has
worked as a full-time, licensed teacher at a public school in this
State for at least 3 consecutive school years [.] ; or
(2) Completed a Health Care Workforce Pathway Program
offered pursuant to section 3.7 of this act and, except as otherwise
provided in subsection 3, has worked in this State for at least 3
consecutive years as a full-time employee in the field of providing,
or directly assisting with the provision of, health care;
(b) Has completed a Free Application for Federal Student Aid
provided for by 20 U.S.C. § 1090; and
(c) Has successfully completed a program at an institution
within the Nevada System of Higher Education for the
preparation of a person to work in the field of providing health
care, or directly assisting with the provision of health care.
2. The program may not provide reimbursement for any tuition
charge, registration fee, laboratory fee or any other mandatory fee
which was paid or otherwise provided for through a scholarship,
financial aid, waiver or similar financial assistance. For the
purposes of this subsection, a student education loan, as defined in
NRS 226.510, must not be considered financial aid or financial
assistance.
3. [The] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the
State Treasurer may provide partial reimbursement of tuition
charges, registration fees, laboratory fees and any other mandatory
fees paid by a person who [completed] :
(a) Completed a Teacher Academy College Pathway Program
offered pursuant to NRS 388.223 and who has worked as a full-
time, licensed teacher at a public school in this State for 1 year or 2
consecutive years [in an] ; or
(b) Completed a Health Care Workforce Pathway Program
offered pursuant to section 3.7 of this act and who has worked in
this State for 1 year or 2 consecutive years as a full-time employee
in the field of providing, or directly assisting with the provision of,
health care.
-
*AB314_R1*

– 4 –
4. The amount of any partial reimbursement provided
pursuant to subsection 3 must not [to] exceed, for each year of
service at a public school in this State [,] or for each year of service
in the health care field in this State, one-third of the total tuition
charges, registration fees, laboratory fees and any other mandatory
fees paid by the person to an institution within the Nevada System
of Higher Education which are subject to reimbursement pursuant to
this section and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
5. If a person has not completed a Health Care Workforce
Pathway Program offered pursuant to 3.7 of this act because of
circumstances beyond the control of that person, including,
without limitation, because the person attended a high school that
did not offer a Program, but the person satisfies the criteria set
forth in paragraphs (c) and (d) of subsection 1, the State
Treasurer may, upon the submission of an application by that
person, provide:
(a) Reimbursement for tuition charges, registration fees,
laboratory fees and any other mandatory fees paid to an institution
within the Nevada System of Higher Education by the person if
the person has worked as a full-time, licensed teacher at a public
school in this State for at least 3 consecutive years.
(b) Partial reimbursement for tuition charges, registration
fees, laboratory fees and any other mandatory fees paid to an
institution within the Nevada System Education, in the amount
described in subsection 3, if the person has worked as a full-time,
licensed teacher at a public school in this State for 1 year or 2
consecutive years.
Sec. 3.3. NRS 226.425 is hereby amended to read as follows:
226.425 1. The Nevada Grown Educator and Health Care
Workforce Account is hereby created in the State General Fund.
The Account must be administered by the State Treasurer.
2. The money in the Account must be used to carry out the
program established pursuant to NRS 226.420.
3. The State Treasurer may apply for and accept any donation,
gift, grant, bequest or other source of money for deposit in the
Account.
4. The interest and income earned on money in the Account,
after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited to the
Account.
5. Any money in the Account remaining at the end of a fiscal
year does not revert to the State General Fund, and the balance in
the Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
Sec. 3.5. NRS 232.985 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.985 1. The Governor’s Office of Workforce Innovation
shall establish and administer a Career Pathways Demonstration
-
*AB314_R1*

– 5 –
Program to develop and implement career pathways that will enable
students to prepare for employment in professions which serve the
long-term needs of this State. The Office shall identify not more
than three priority industries, including, without limitation, K-12
education [,] and health care, for the development and
implementation of career pathways as part of the Program.
2. In implementing the Program, the Office shall:
(a) Establish clear, measurable objectives for the outcomes of
the Program which are aligned with the State Plan for Economic
Development developed by the Executive Director of the Office of
Economic Development within the Office of the Governor pursuant
to subsection 2 of NRS 231.053, including, without limitation,
targets based on reliable data concerning:
(1) The number of persons entering the career pathway;
(2) The number and percentage of persons completing
distinct phases of the career pathway, as marked by earning course
credit or a credential, certificate or other recognized documentation
showing progression in the career pathway;
(3) The number and percentage of participants in a career
pathway who obtain high-quality employment in the target industry;
and
(4) The number and percentage of participants in a career
pathway employed for at least 2 years in the target industry.
(b) Rely on economic and workforce development data to
inform decision-making, including, without limitation:
(1) Estimates of the number of high-quality jobs in the
priority industries identified by the Office, including, without
limitation, K-12 education and health care, that will be required in
this State in the next 5 to 10 years;
(2) Projected workforce capacity in relation to the estimates
pursuant to subparagraph (1);
(3) The number and capacity of existing industry-aligned
career pathway programs;
(4) Enrollment, participation and completion rates for
industry-aligned career pathway programs;
(5) Credentialing rates or other industry-aligned indicators of
workforce readiness;
(6) Industry-aligned, skill-based employee retention rates;
(7) The demographic information of the participants in the
Program, including, without limitation, race, gender and enrollment
at a Title I school; and
(8) Other relevant data available through the statewide
longitudinal data system maintained by the Executive Director of
the Office pursuant to NRS 232.975.
-
*AB314_R1*

– 6 –
(c) Collaborate with school districts, the Nevada System of
Higher Education, regional development authorities and
representatives from priority industries.
(d) Establish criteria for evaluating the performance of career
pathway projects and the entities that assist in the development and
implementation of career pathway projects, including, without
limitation, the Department of Education, school districts, the Nevada
System of Higher Education, regional development authorities and
representatives from priority industries.
3. The Office shall develop and implement a competitive
process to select proposals for career pathway projects. Each
proposal for a career pathway project selected by the Office must
incorporate best practices for career pathway design and address,
without limitation:
(a) The types of high-quality jobs which the career pathway
project will prepare students for, based on a definition of “high-
quality job” which shall be developed and promulgated by the
Office.
(b) The educational opportunities that the project will offer to K-
12 pupils and students of the Nevada System of Higher Education
which may include, without limitation:
(1) Early exposure to career options for pupils in elementary,
junior high or middle school;
(2) Multiple entry points into the career pathway;
(3) Meaningful, practice-based learning opportunities aligned
to the career pathway and the workforce priorities within the target
industry, including, without limitation, paid work-based learning
opportunities;
(4) Opportunities for students to receive credentials aligned
to the skills and experience needed for employment in the target
industry; and
(5) Work-based learning opportunities that may be eligible
for exemption from federal laws and regulations from which
exemptions are available for work-based learning programs for
pupils.
(c) The practices that will be implemented to recruit students for
the career pathway, including, without limitation, practices that will
foster equity and the inclusion in the career pathway of students
from historically underserved communities.
(d) The types of early career guidance, incentives and support
that will be offered to participants in the career pathway, which may
include, without limitation:
(1) Employment opportunities for students who participate in
the career pathway, including, without limitation, employer
-
*AB314_R1*

– 7 –
commitments to recruiting students who successfully obtain the
qualifications for employment through the career pathway;
(2) Professional support and development opportunities for
participants early in their career in the target industry, including,
without limitation, mentoring; and
(3) Financial incentives which eliminate or substantially
reduce financial barriers to entry into professions in the target
industry.
(e) The roles and responsibilities of the persons necessary to
develop and implement the career pathway, which may include,
without limitation:
(1) Program staff;
(2) School districts and the Nevada System of Higher
Education;
(3) Regional development authorities; and
(4) Representatives from the target industries.
(f) The financial plan for the career pathway project, including,
without limitation:
(1) The projected 5-year budget for the career pathway
project;
(2) Existing funding sources for the career pathway project
and the amount of funding that the person submitting the proposal
will allocate to the project;
(3) Anticipated funding sources for the career pathway
project; and
(4) Any additional funding necessary to implement the career
pathway project which is not addressed by the existing funding
sources.
(g) The goals and anticipated outcomes of the career pathway
project, including, without limitation:
(1) The target number of total participants in the career
pathway project;
(2) The target number of participants who will successfully
complete each stage of the career pathway, as marked by earning
course credit or a credential, certificate or other recognized
documentation showing progression in the career pathway; and
(3) The target number of participants who will complete the
career pathway, regardless of their entry point into the career
pathway.
4. The Office may enter into an agreement with the Department
of Education to administer the Teacher Academy College Pathway
Program offered pursuant to NRS 388.223. Such an agreement may
require the Department of Education to administer any local, state or
federal funding appropriated or otherwise available to implement
the Teacher Academy College Pathway Program.
-
*AB314_R1*

– 8 –
5. As used in this section, “career pathway” means a series of
structured and connected educational opportunities designed to help
a person enter or advance within a given occupation or industry
sector.
Sec. 3.7. Chapter 388 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, each large
school district shall offer a Health Care Workforce Pathway
Program at every high school in the school district with 250 or
more pupils enrolled that will enable interested pupils in grades 9
to 12, inclusive, to prepare for employment in professions in the
field of health care. A large school district may offer a Program at
high schools with fewer than 250 pupils. A school district that is
not a large school district may offer a Program at one or more
high schools in the school district.
2. A large school district is not required to offer a Program at
a specialty school.
3. A large school district, and a school district that is not a
large school district which elects to offer the Program, shall:
(a) Advertise the Program and the benefits of participation in
the Program.
(b) Ensure that at least one licensed teacher is assigned full-
time to implement and teach the Program at each high school in
the school district which offers the Program and at which more
than two class periods of the Program are offered, except that
such a teacher may also serve as the person designated to
coordinate career pathway programs at the high school.
(c) Assess each pupil entering grade 9 who is or will be
enrolled in a high school which offers such a Program and who is
interested in participating in the Program, identify any barriers,
including, without limitation, academic, financial, socioeconomic
and transportation barriers, to the participation in and completion
of the Program by such interested pupils and, if such barriers are
identified, inform the pupil and the parents or legal guardian of
the pupil of any programs and services which are available to help
the pupil to overcome such barriers and provide such programs
and services to the pupil.
(d) Enter into an agreement with the Board of Regents of the
University of Nevada to:
(1) Enable pupils who participate in the Program to earn
up to 12 units of college credit for courses taken and internships
engaged in as part of the Program and, to the extent that money is
available, the provision of such courses and internships at no cost
or reduced cost to the pupil.
-
*AB314_R1*

– 9 –
(2) Establish qualifications for teachers of the school
district who teach courses in the Program which are eligible for
college credit, which may include, without limitation, a minimum
of 4 years of classroom teaching experience or a master’s degree.
(3) Guarantee the admission of otherwise academically
qualified pupils who complete the Program to institutions in the
Nevada System of Higher Education.
(4) Provide programs, services, scholarships and financial
aid to assist pupils who participate in the Program in applying for
admission to institutions in the Nevada System of Higher
Education and completing the Program at such an institution.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, offer dual
credit courses that align with the goals of the Program at each
high school in the school district which offers the Program.
(f) Inform pupils who participate in the Program and the
parents and legal guardians of such pupils about programs,
services, scholarships and financial aid which are available to
assist pupils in applying for admission to institutions in the
Nevada System of Higher Education and completing the Program
at such an institution.
4. A school district may apply to the State Board for an
exemption from the provisions of paragraph (d) of subsection 2
with respect to a high school which is not located in an
incorporated city if the school district can demonstrate that the
location of the high school makes compliance with those
provisions impracticable.
5. A large school district, and a school district that is not a
large school district which elects to offer the Program, may enter
into an agreement with the Board of Regents of the University of
Nevada to provide a faculty mentor from the Nevada System of
Higher Education to teachers of the school district who teach
courses in the Program to ensure such courses align with the
contents and rigor of equivalent courses taught at institutions
within the Nevada System of Higher Education. If the provisions
of this subsection conflict with the provisions of chapter 388G of
NRS, the provisions of this subsection prevail.
6. To complete the Program a pupil must:
(a) Successfully complete at least 2 academic years in a
program of career and technical education established pursuant to
NRS 388.380 in the area of health care; and
(b) Participate in at least 15 hours of paid or unpaid work-
based learning which is relevant to the field of health care and
may include, without limitation, an internship offered pursuant to
paragraph (e) of subsection 3 or a work-based learning
opportunity provided pursuant to NRS 232.990.
-
*AB314_R1*

– 10 –
7. The State Board:
(a) Shall adopt regulations that prescribe the curriculum for
the Program which are consistent with the provisions of this
section. To the extent a school district provides programs of career
and technical education other than the Program, such programs
of career and technical education must nonetheless be consistent
with the regulations adopted pursuant to this paragraph, to the
extent applicable.
(b) May adopt such other regulations as are necessary to carry
out the provisions of this section.
8. A pupil who is enrolled in a high school within a school
district, or a parent or legal guardian of such a pupil, who is
aggrieved by a final decision regarding the implementation of the
Program made by an administrator of the high school or the board
of trustees may, within 30 days after the decision is rendered,
make a written request to the board of trustees for a hearing for
reconsideration of the decision. The board shall schedule the
hearing within 30 days after receiving the request. The decision of
the board of trustees after its reconsideration hearing is a final
decision subject to judicial review as provided by law.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Career Pathway Program” means a career pathway
offered as part of the Career Pathways Demonstration Program
pursuant to NRS 232.985.
(b) “Large school district” means any school district in this
State which has more than 100,000 pupils enrolled in its public
schools.
(c) “Program” means the Health Care Workforce Pathway
Program created pursuant to this section.
Sec. 3.9. NRS 396.1219 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.1219 1. The Board of Regents may enter into an
agreement with a school district pursuant to NRS 388.223 to assist
in the implementation of a Teacher Academy College Pathway
Program [.] and pursuant to section 3.7 of this act to assist in the
implementation of a Health Care Workforce Pathway Program.
2. The Board of Regents may, by regulation, establish a
program to:
(a) Identify pupils who have completed the Program, or who are
expected to complete the Program by the end of grade 12, and who
wish to apply for admission to an institution within the System; and
(b) Inform such pupils of the institutions within the System
where such pupils may academically qualify for admission.
3. As used in this section, “Program” [has the meaning
ascribed to it in] means the Teacher Academy College Pathway
Program and the Health Care Workforce Pathway Program
-
*AB314_R1*

– 11 –
created pursuant to NRS 388.223 [.] and section 3.7 of this act,
respectively.
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4.5. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 5. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 4.5, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB314_R1*